Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-231
Supreme Court Attorney Services Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The Supreme Court Attorney Services Cash Fund is created. The fund shall be under the control of the Supreme Court and administered by the State Court Administrator. The fund shall consist of mandatory assessments and fees, grants, donations, and gifts. The fund shall be used for expenses related to regulation of the practice of law in Nebraska. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Interest earned shall be credited back to the fund.

Laws 2015, LB194, § 1.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.